Louisiana, session 2026, HB276.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 313(A)(2) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 313. Gwen's Law; bail hearings; detention without bail
A.
* * *
(2)(a) A contradictory bail hearing, as provided for in this Paragraph, may
be held prior to setting bail for a person in custody who is charged with any of the
following offenses:
(i) First degree rape (R.S. 14:42), when committed against a child under the
age of eighteen.
(ii) Second degree rape (R.S. 14:42.1), when committed against a child under
the age of eighteen.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-266 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 276
(iii) Third degree rape (R.S. 14:43), when committed against a child under
the age of eighteen.
(iv) Sexual battery (R.S. 14:43.1), when committed against a child under the
age of eighteen.
(v) Oral sexual battery (R.S. 14:43.3), when committed against a child under
the age of eighteen.
(vi) Human trafficking (R.S. 14:46.2), when committed against a child under
the age of eighteen.
(vii) Child sexual abuse materials (R.S. 14:81.1), when committed against
a child under the age of eighteen.
(viii) Molestation of a juvenile or a person with a physical or mental
disability (R.S. 14:81.2), when committed against a child under the age of eighteen.
(ix) Aggravated crime against nature (R.S. 14:89.1), when committed against
a child under the age of eighteen.
(x) domestic Domestic abuse battery, (R.S. 14:35.3).
(xi) violation Violation of protective orders, (R.S. 14:79).
(xii) stalking Stalking, (R.S. 14:40.2).
(xiii) or any Any felony offense involving the use or threatened use of force
or a deadly weapon upon any of the following:
(aa) the The defendant's family member, as defined in R.S. 46:2132 or upon
the.
(bb) The defendant's household member as defined in R.S. 14:35.3, or upon
the.
(cc) The defendant's dating partner, as defined in R.S. 46:2151.
(b) If the court orders a contradictory hearing, the hearing shall be held
within five days from the date of determination of probable cause, exclusive of
weekends and legal holidays. At the contradictory hearing, the court shall determine
the conditions of bail or whether the defendant should be held without bail pending
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-266 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 276
trial. If the court decides not to hold a contradictory hearing, it shall notify the
prosecuting attorney prior to setting bail.
* * *